Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 1. Mineral Mining Retaining Dams and Refuse Piles.

§ 45.2-1300.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Impound water”
means to impound water for use in carrying out any part of the process necessary in the production or preparation of minerals.

“Refuse”
means waste material resulting from a mineral mining operation.

“Silt”
means fine particles resulting from a mineral mining operation, suspended in or deposited by water.

“Water”
means water used in a mining operation.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-225.3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1301.
Dams and mine refuse piles; construction.

Any water-retaining or silt-retaining dam or mine refuse pile or modification of an existing water-retaining or silt-retaining dam or mine refuse pile shall be designed and constructed by or under the direction of a qualified engineer if such dam or pile is designed to impound water or silt to a height of (i) five feet or more above the lowest natural ground level within the impounded area and has a storage volume of 50 acre-feet or more or (ii) 20 feet or more, regardless of storage volume.

Designs, construction specifications, and other related data, including final abandonment plans, for a water-retaining or silt-retaining dam or mine refuse pile shall be approved and certified by the qualified engineer as specified in subsection A and by the licensed operator or his agent.

The designs, construction specifications, and other related data approved and certified in accordance with subsection B shall be submitted for approval to the Director. If the Director approves the submittal, he shall notify the licensed operator in writing. If the Director disapproves the submittal, he shall notify the licensed operator with his written objections and required amendments. The Director shall approve or disapprove the submittal within 30 days following receipt thereof.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-225.1; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Cross references.

As to definition of impounding structure, see § 10.1-604.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1302.
Examination of dams and mine refuse piles; potentially hazardous conditions; plans to be submitted by licensed operators.

Every water-retaining or silt-retaining dam or mine refuse pile shall be examined daily for visible structural weakness, volume overload, and other hazards by a qualified person designated by the licensed operator. When rising water and silt reaches 80 percent by volume of the safe design capacity of the dam or pile, such examination shall be made more often as required by the Director or his designated agent. Frequent examinations shall be made during periods of rainfall that could create flooding conditions.

When a potentially hazardous condition exists, the operator shall initiate procedures to:

Remove all persons from the area that can reasonably be expected to be affected by such potentially hazardous condition;

Eliminate such potentially hazardous condition; and

Notify the Director.

Records of the inspections required by subsection A shall be kept and certified by the licensed operator or his agent. Such records shall be kept on the surface at the office or designated station of the mine.

The licensed operator of each mineral mine on which a water-retaining or silt-retaining dam is located shall adopt a plan for carrying out the requirements of subsections A and B. The plan shall be submitted for approval to the Director and shall include:

A schedule and procedures for the inspection of the retaining dam by a qualified person;

Procedures for evaluating any potentially hazardous condition;

Procedures for removing all persons from the area that may reasonably be expected to be affected by such potentially hazardous condition;

Procedures for eliminating such potentially hazardous condition;

Procedures for notifying the Director; and

Any additional information that may be required by the Director.

Before making any change or modification in the plan approved in accordance with subsection D, the licensed operator shall obtain approval of such change or modification from the Director.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-225.2; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.